Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-105 Authorized business. (a)
Each title insurer may engage in the title insurance business in this State if
licensed to do so by the commissioner.

(b) Each domestic title insurer may issue
policies and may also insure:

(1) The identity, due execution, and validity of any
note or bond secured by mortgage;

(2) The identity, due execution, validity, recording
of any such mortgage; and

(3) The identity, due execution, and validity of
evidences of indebtedness issued by this State, by any political subdivision or
district therein, or by any private or public corporation. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next